test/src/morphology/N-soomm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - šoomm e-stem humina: # Noun - full paradigm
     šoomm+N+Sg+Nom: šoomm
     šoomm+N+Sg+Gen: šoom
     šoomm+N+Sg+Acc: šoom
     šoomm+N+Sg+Ill: šummu
     šoomm+N+Sg+Loc: šoomast
     šoomm+N+Sg+Com: šoomain
     šoomm+N+Ess: šoomman
     šoomm+N+Par: šoommad
     šoomm+N+Sg+Abe: šoomtää
     šoomm+N+Pl+Nom: šoom
     šoomm+N+Pl+Gen: šoomai
     šoomm+N+Pl+Acc: šoomaid
     šoomm+N+Pl+Ill: šoomaid
     šoomm+N+Pl+Loc: šoomain
     šoomm+N+Pl+Com: šoomaivui′m
     šoomm+N+Pl+Abe: šoomaitää
